Massachusetts, session 194th, S1387.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. The first sentence of subsection (a) of section 12 of chapter 123 of the
General Laws is hereby amended by inserting after the words “section 2 of chapter 112,” the
following words:- a physician assistant licensed pursuant to section 9E of chapter 112,.
SECTION 2. The second sentence of said subsection (a) of said section 12 of said chapter
123 is hereby amended by inserting after the word “physician,” the following words:- , physician
assistant.
of 2

SECTION 3. The third sentence of said subsection (a) of said section 12 of said chapter
123 is hereby amended by inserting after the word “physician,” the following words:- , physician
assistant.
SECTION 4. Section 12 of said chapter 123 is hereby amended by adding the following
subsection:-
(f) Before any individual authorized by this section shall restrain an individual or
authorize a psychiatric hold, the individual shall undergo 3 hours of specialized training in direct
mental health evaluation. The training shall be developed pursuant to regulations and
specifications by the department of mental health.
of 2